Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Stem Cell Research Act:

(1) Committee means the Stem Cell Research Advisory Committee;

(2) Human embryo means the developing human organism from the time of fertilization until the end of the eighth week of gestation and includes an embryo or developing human organism created by somatic cell nuclear transfer; and

(3) Somatic cell nuclear transfer means a technique in which the nucleus of an oocyte is replaced with the nucleus of a somatic cell.

Laws 2008, LB606, § 2.